Hawaii, session 2025, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Student to teacher ratios.  (a)  The department shall adopt the board of education's recommended student to teacher ratios to promote quality instruction and positive student-teacher interaction.  The optimal class size for department schools is designated by the following student to teacher ratios: (1)  Grades K-3 shall be or shall not exceed 20:1; provided that the maximum class size for grades K-2 shall be or shall not exceed 25:1; and (2)  Grades 4-12 shall be or shall not exceed 26:1. (b)  In the event that these class ratios cannot be met, schools must notify parents and guardians for the rationale of any changes. (c)  In determining compliance with this section, schools shall not average student to teacher ratios based on total student enrollment and total teachers. (d)  The department shall implement this policy to ensure that instructional personnel and other staff are allocated in a manner that is educationally sound, instructionally appropriate, informative to parents and guardians, and consistent with available funding." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________